Hawaii statutes.
[§323G-1]
Definitions. As used in this chapter:

"After-care" means any assistance
provided by a caregiver to a patient following the patient's discharge from a
hospital that is related to the patient's condition at the time of discharge,
including but not limited to assisting with basic activities of daily living,
instrumental activities of daily living, and other tasks determined to be
appropriate by the discharging physician or other health care professional
licensed pursuant to chapter 453 or 457.

"Caregiver" means any individual duly
designated by a patient to provide after-care to the patient in the patient's
residence. The term includes but is not limited to a relative, spouse,
partner, friend, or neighbor who has a significant relationship with the
patient.

"Contact information" means name,
phone number, electronic mail address, and address of residence, where
available.

"Discharge" means a patient's exit or
release from a hospital to the patient's residence following any medical care
or treatment rendered to the patient following an inpatient admission.

"Entry" means a patient's entrance
into a hospital for the purpose of receiving inpatient medical care.

"Hospital" means a facility licensed
under section 321‑14.5, excluding children's hospitals and specialty
hospitals.

"Patient" means an individual
admitted to a hospital for inpatient treatment.

"Residence" means a dwelling that the
patient considers to be the patient's home and shall not include any
residential facility, treatment facility, or home licensed or certified by the
department of health under chapter 321, or a private residence used for
commercial purposes to care for dependent individuals. [L 2016, c 69, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next